Utah statutes.
53-9-105.   Powers and duties of the board.

(1)  The board shall:

(a)  review all applications for licenses and renewals of licenses for private investigators and make recommendations to the commissioner for approval or disapproval;

(b)  upon receiving a timely filed petition, review within a reasonable time the denial, suspension, or revocation of a private investigator license; and

(c)  review all complaints and make recommendations to the commissioner regarding disciplinary action.

(2)  The board may take and hear evidence, administer oaths and affirmations, and compel by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records, documents, and other information relating to a formal complaint against or department investigation of a private investigator.

